Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.123.050

Certified public accounting scholarship transfer account.

(1) The certified public accounting scholarship transfer account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used solely for scholarships and the administration of the program created in RCW 28B.123.010.

(2) Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature and any gifts, grants, or donations received by the board for this purpose.

(3) Only the director of the board or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the certified public accounting scholarship transfer account. The account is not subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2015 c 215 s 5.]